Illinois, session 104th, HB4023.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Procurement Code is amended by 5adding Section 25-210 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 500/25-210 new)7    Sec. 25-210. Insurrection contract prohibition.8    (a) No State agency shall enter into a contract with a 9business, person, or other entity that has been found to have 10committed insurrection or advocated the overthrow of the 11federal or State government.12    (b) As soon as practicable after the effective date of 13this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, each unit 14of local government in this State shall adopt an ordinance or 15resolution that regulates, in a manner no less restrictive 16than this Section, contracts between those units of local 17government and businesses, persons, or other entities that 18have been found to have committed insurrection or advocated 19the overthrow of the federal or State government.20    (c) For the purposes of this Section, a business, person, 21or entity is found to have committed insurrection or advocated 22the overthrow of the federal or State government if that 23business, person, or entity is found guilty under either 18   HB4023- 2 -LRB104 12565 HLH 23067 b1U.S.C. 2383 or Section 30-3 of the Criminal Code of 2012.2    (d) This Section is a limitation under subsection (i) of 3Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the 4concurrent exercise by home rule units of powers and functions 5exercised by the State.